Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2386.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Optician Certification and Consumer Vision Protection Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Apprenticeship." An approved supervised training under a certified optician, optometrist or ophthalmologist."Board." The State Board of Opticianry established in section 4."Certification." A current certification by an agency approved by the State Board of Opticianry."Certification-based registration." The process by which 123456789101112131415161718 certified opticians are registered with the board."Optician." A health care professional who provides patient education for prescription eyewear and associated optical devices, performs measurements, analyzes and interprets a prescription, prepares, fits and dispenses eyeglasses, contact lenses and related optical devices based on a prescription from an ophthalmologist or optometrist.Section 3. Certification-based registration requirement.(a) Requirement to practice.--An individual may not practice as an optician or use titles such as "optician," "dispensing optician," "optical technician" or "ophthalmic dispenser" unless the individual is registered with the board and holds a current certification.(b) Requirements for registration.--An applicant for certification-based registration shall submit to the board:(1) Proof of passage of a certification exam approved by the State Board of Opticianry.(2) Documentation required by the board, including:(i) Current national opticianry certification.(ii) If fitting contact lenses, current national contact lens certification.(iii) Completion of minimum required continuing education by the board.(iv) Additional requirements of the board.(3) Proof of passage of a certification exam approved by the board and completion of one of the following:(i) An associate degree in opticianry from a regionally accredited opticianry program as approved by the State Board of Education.(ii) Certificate of completion of a minimum of 2,400 20260HB2386PN3200 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hours of supervised apprenticeship.(iii) Completion of a State-approved area career and technical school education program.(4) Payment of an applicable registration fee.Section 4. State Board of Opticianry.(a) Establishment.--The State Board of Opticianry is established to oversee certification-based registration, discipline and rulemaking.(b) Membership.--The board shall consist of the following, chosen by the Governor:(1) Three certified opticians.(2) One ophthalmologist or optometrist.(3) One public member.(c) Quorum.--A majority of members must be physically present or online through a live-stream synchronous video conference or similar virtual presence technology to constitute a quorum. Members who miss three consecutive meetings without an approved excuse shall forfeit their membership.(d) Duties.--The board shall:(1) Enforce this act.(2) Review complaints and impose disciplinary actions under this act and regulations promulgated under this act.(3) Approve continuing education standards.(4) Coordinate with agencies approved by the board for certification verification.Section 5. Certification maintenance and registry.(a) Maintaining certification.--An optician must maintain active certification from an organization approved by the board to practice as an optician.(b) Renewal.--Certification shall be renewed every three 20260HB2386PN3200 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 years with a minimum of nine credits in spectacle education and 12 credits in contact lens education, if applicable, tri-annually received through in-person education. The board may require additional continuing education credits annually.(c) Acceptance.--The board shall annually accept an upload of certified opticians from an organization approved by the board.(d) Public registry.--The board shall maintain a public registry of certified and registered opticians.Section 6. Applicability.This act applies as follows:(1) This act shall not apply to:(i) Ophthalmologists or optometrists.(ii) Technicians working under the supervision of a licensed ophthalmologist or optometrist.(iii) Students in accredited opticianry programs under supervision.(2) An optician with 10 or more years of documented professional experience prior to the effective date of this paragraph shall be exempt from certification requirements for a period of 24 months. Opticians with a current license from another state shall have three months to reinstate their certification with the agency approved by the board.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2386PN3200 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425